North Carolina statutes. Chapter 50. Divorce and Alimony.
Article 1. Divorce, Alimony, and Child Support, Generally.
§ 50-13.5.
Procedure in actions for custody or support of minor children.

Procedure. — The procedure in actions for custody and support of minor children shall be as in civil actions, except as provided in this section and in

G.S. 50-19

. In this

G.S. 50-13.5

the words “custody and support” shall be deemed to include custody or support, or both.

Type of Action. — An action brought under the provisions of this section may be maintained as follows:

As a civil action.

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 110, s. 12.

Joined with an action for annulment, or an action for divorce, either absolute or from bed and board, or an action for alimony without divorce.

As a cross action in an action for annulment, or an action for divorce, either absolute or from bed and board, or an action for alimony without divorce.

By motion in the cause in an action for annulment, or an action for divorce, either absolute or from bed and board, or an action for alimony without divorce.

Upon the court’s own motion in an action for annulment, or an action for divorce, either absolute or from bed and board, or an action for alimony without divorce.

In any of the foregoing the judge may issue an order requiring that the body of the minor child be brought before him.

Jurisdiction in Actions or Proceedings for Child Support and Child Custody. —

The jurisdiction of the courts of this State to enter orders providing for the support of a minor child shall be as in actions or proceedings for the payment of money or the transfer of property.

The courts of this State shall have jurisdiction to enter orders providing for the custody of a minor child under the provisions of

G.S. 50A-201

, 50A-202, and 50A-204.

to (6) Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 110, s. 12.

Service of Process; Notice; Interlocutory Orders. —

Service of process in civil actions for the custody of minor children shall be as in other civil actions. Motions for support of a minor child in a pending action may be made on 10 days notice to the other parties and compliance with G.S. 50-13.5(e). Motions for custody of a minor child in a pending action may be made on 10 days notice to the other parties and after compliance with

G.S. 50A-205

.

If the circumstances of the case render it appropriate, upon gaining jurisdiction of the minor child the court may enter orders for the temporary custody and support of the child, pending the service of process or notice as herein provided.

A temporary order for custody which changes the living arrangements of a child or changes custody shall not be entered ex parte and prior to service of process or notice, unless the court finds that the child is exposed to a substantial risk of bodily injury or sexual abuse or that there is a substantial risk that the child may be abducted or removed from the State of North Carolina for the purpose of evading the jurisdiction of North Carolina courts. A temporary custody order that requires a law enforcement officer to take physical custody of a minor child shall be accompanied by a warrant to take physical custody of a minor child as set forth in

G.S. 50A-311

.

Notice to Additional Persons in Support Actions and Proceedings; Intervention. —

The parents of the minor child whose addresses are reasonably ascertainable; any person, agency, organization or institution having actual care, control, or custody of a minor child; and any person, agency, organization or institution required by court order to provide for the support of a minor child, either in whole or in part, not named as parties and served with process in an action or proceeding for the support of such child, shall be given notice by the party raising the issue of support.

The notice herein required shall be in the manner provided by the Rules of Civil Procedure for the service of notices in actions. Such notice shall advise the person to be notified of the name of the child, the names of the parties to the action or proceeding, the court in which the action or proceeding was instituted, and the date thereof.

In the discretion of the court, failure of such service of notice shall not affect the validity of any order or judgment entered in such action or proceeding.

Any person required to be given notice as herein provided may intervene in an action or proceeding for support of a minor child by filing in apt time notice of appearance or other appropriate pleadings.

Venue. — An action or proceeding in the courts of this State for custody and support of a minor child may be maintained in the county where the child resides or is physically present or in a county where a parent resides, except as hereinafter provided. If an action for annulment, for divorce, either absolute or from bed and board, or for alimony without divorce has been previously instituted in this State, until there has been a final judgment in such case, any action or proceeding for custody and support of the minor children of the marriage shall be joined with such action or be by motion in the cause in such action. If an action or proceeding for the custody and support of a minor child has been instituted and an action for annulment or for divorce, either absolute or from bed and board, or for alimony without divorce is subsequently instituted in the same or another county, the court having jurisdiction of the prior action or proceeding may, in its discretion direct that the action or proceeding for custody and support of a minor child be consolidated with such subsequent action, and in the event consolidation is ordered, shall determine in which court such consolidated action or proceeding shall be heard.

Custody and Support Irrespective of Parents’ Rights Inter Partes. — Orders for custody and support of minor children may be entered when the matter is before the court as provided by this section, irrespective of the rights of the wife and the husband as between themselves in an action for annulment or an action for divorce, either absolute or from bed and board, or an action for alimony without divorce.

Court Having Jurisdiction. — When a district court having jurisdiction of the matter shall have been established, actions or proceedings for custody and support of minor children shall be heard without a jury by the judge of such district court, and may be heard at any time.

District Court; Denial of Parental Visitation Right; Written Finding of Fact. — In any case in which an award of child custody is made in a district court, the trial judge, prior to denying a parent the right of reasonable visitation, shall make a written finding of fact that the parent being denied visitation rights is an unfit person to visit the child or that such visitation rights are not in the best interest of the child.

Custody and Visitation Rights of Grandparents. — In any action in which the custody of a minor child has been determined, upon a motion in the cause and a showing of changed circumstances pursuant to

G.S. 50-13.7

, the grandparents of the child are entitled to such custody or visitation rights as the court, in its discretion, deems appropriate. As used in this subsection, “grandparent” includes a biological grandparent of a child adopted by a stepparent or a relative of the child where a substantial relationship exists between the grandparent and the child. Under no circumstances shall a biological grandparent of a child adopted by adoptive parents, neither of whom is related to the child and where parental rights of both biological parents have been terminated, be entitled to visitation rights.

History.

1858-9, c. 53, s. 2; 1871-2, c. 193, ss. 39, 46; Code, ss. 1292, 1296, 1570, 1662; Rev., ss. 1567, 1570, 1854; 1919, c. 24; C.S., ss. 1664, 1667, 2242; 1921, c. 13; 1923, c. 52; 1939, c. 115; 1941, c. 120; 1943, c. 194; 1949, c. 1010; 1951, c. 893, s. 3; 1953, cc. 813, 925; 1955, cc. 814, 1189; 1957, c. 545; 1965, c. 310, s. 2; 1967, c. 1153, s. 2; 1971, c. 1185, s. 24; 1973, c. 751; 1979, c. 110, s. 12; c. 563; c. 709, s. 3; 1981, c. 735, s. 3; 1983, c. 587; 1985, c. 575, s. 4; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 893, s. 3.1; 1999-223, ss. 11, 12; 2017-22, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to actions for custody, see also

G.S. 50-13.1

through 50-13.3 and notes thereunder.

As to actions for support, see also

G.S. 50-13.4

and notes thereunder.

As to maintenance of certain actions as independent actions, see

G.S. 50-19

.

For the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act, see

G.S. 50A-1

et seq.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-22, s. 2, added the last sentence of subdivision (d)(3). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on jurisdictional and full faith and credit requirements of custody awards of minor children, see 30 N.C.L. Rev. 282 (1952).

For note on the domicile rule in custody proceedings, see 35 N.C.L. Rev. 83 (1956).

For note on voluntary nonsuit in custody action, see 44 N.C.L. Rev. 1138 (1966).

For note on choice of law rules in North Carolina, see 48 N.C.L. Rev. 243 (1970).

For survey of 1972 case law on child support and pre-Chapter 48A consent judgments, see 51 N.C.L. Rev. 1091 (1973).

For survey of 1976 case law on domestic relations, see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 1018 (1977).

For survey of 1979 family law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1471 (1980).

For article, “Equating a Stepparent’s Rights and Liabilities vis-a-vis Custody, Visitation and Support upon Dissolution of the Marriage with Those of the Natural Parent — An Equitable Solution to a Growing Dilemma?,” see 17 N.C. Cent. L.J. 1 (1988).

For an article on recent developments in third-party custody proceedings after Petersen v. Rogers and Price v. Howard, see 76 N.C.L. Rev. 2145 (1998).

§ 50-13.6.
Counsel fees in actions for custody and support of minor children.

In an action or proceeding for the custody or support, or both, of a minor child, including a motion in the cause for the modification or revocation of an existing order for custody or support, or both, the court may in its discretion order payment of reasonable attorney’s fees to an interested party acting in good faith who has insufficient means to defray the expense of the suit. Before ordering payment of a fee in a support action, the court must find as a fact that the party ordered to furnish support has refused to provide support which is adequate under the circumstances existing at the time of the institution of the action or proceeding; provided however, should the court find as a fact that the supporting party has initiated a frivolous action or proceeding the court may order payment of reasonable attorney’s fees to an interested party as deemed appropriate under the circumstances.

History.

1967, c. 1153, s. 2; 1973, c. 323.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1976 case law on domestic relations, see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 1018 (1977).

For survey of 1977 law on domestic relations, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 1045 (1978).

For article, “Using Hindsight to Change Child Support Obligations: A Survey of Retroactive Modification and Reimbursement of Child Support in North Carolina,” see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 111 (1987).

§ 50-13.7.
Modification of order for child support or custody.

An order of a court of this State for support of a minor child may be modified or vacated at any time, upon motion in the cause and a showing of changed circumstances by either party or anyone interested subject to the limitations of

G.S. 50-13.10

. Subject to

G.S. 50A-201

, 50A-202, and 50A-204, an order of a court of this State for custody of a minor child may be modified or vacated at any time, upon motion in the cause and a showing of changed circumstances by either party or anyone interested.

When an order for support of a minor child has been entered by a court of another state, a court of this State may, upon gaining jurisdiction, and upon a showing of changed circumstances, enter a new order for support that modifies or supersedes the order for support, subject to the limitations of

G.S. 50-13.10

. Subject to

G.S. 50A-201

, 50A-202, and 50A-204, when an order for custody of a minor child has been entered by a court of another state, a court of this State may, upon gaining jurisdiction, and a showing of changed circumstances, enter a new order for custody that modifies or supersedes the order for custody.

History.

1858-9, c. 53; 1868-9, c. 116, s. 36; 1871-2, c. 193, s. 46; Code, ss. 1296, 1570, 1661; Rev., ss. 1570, 1853; C.S., ss. 1664, 2241; 1929, c. 270, s. 1; 1939, c. 115; 1941, c. 120; 1943, c. 194; 1949, c. 1010; 1953, c. 813; 1957, c. 545; 1965, c. 310, s. 2; 1967, c. 1153, s. 2; 1979, c. 110, s. 13; 1981, c. 682, s. 12; 1987, c. 739, s. 3; 1999-223, s. 13; 2007-175, s. 1; 2021-88, s. 6.

Cross References.

As to the vesting of past due child support payments, see

G.S. 50-13.10

.

As to distribution by court of marital property upon divorce, see

G.S. 50-20

.

For the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act, see

G.S. 50A-1

et seq.

§ 50-13.7A.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-27, s. 2, effective October 1, 2013.

History.

2007-175, s. 2; repealed by 2013-27, s. 2 effective October 1, 2013.

§ 50-13.8.
Custody of persons incapable of self-support upon reaching majority.

For the purposes of custody, the rights of a person who is mentally or physically incapable of self-support upon reaching his majority shall be the same as a minor child for so long as he remains mentally or physically incapable of self-support.

History.

1967, c. 1153, s. 2; 1971, c. 218, s. 3; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; 1979, c. 838, s. 29; 1989, c. 210.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1972 case law on child support and pre-Chapter 48A consent judgments, see 51 N.C.L. Rev. 1091 (1973).

§ 50-13.9.
Procedure to insure payment of child support.

Upon its own motion or upon motion of either party, the court may order at any time that support payments be made to the State Child Support Collection and Disbursement Unit for remittance to the party entitled to receive the payments. For child support orders initially entered on or after January 1, 1994, the immediate income withholding provisions of G.S. 110-136.5(c1) apply.

After entry of an order by the court under subsection (a) of this section, the State Child Support Collection and Disbursement Unit shall transmit child support payments that are made to it to the custodial parent or other party entitled to receive them, unless a court order requires otherwise.

(b1)

In a IV-D case:

The designated child support enforcement agency shall have the sole responsibility and authority for monitoring the obligor’s compliance with all child support orders in the case and for initiating any enforcement procedures that it considers appropriate.

The clerk of court shall maintain all official records in the case.

The designated child support enforcement agency shall maintain any other records needed to monitor the obligor’s compliance with or to enforce the child support orders in the case, including records showing the amount of each payment of child support received from or on behalf of the obligor, along with the dates on which each payment was received. In any action establishing, enforcing, or modifying a child support order, the payment records maintained by the designated child support agency shall be admissible evidence, and the court shall permit the designated representative to authenticate those records.

(b2)

In a non-IV-D case:

(1)

Repealed by Session Laws 2005, ch. 389, s. 1.

(2)

The clerk of court shall maintain all official records and all case data concerning child support matters previously enforced by the clerk of court.

(3)

Repealed by Session Laws 2005, ch. 389, s. 1.

In a IV-D case, the parties affected by the order shall inform the designated child support enforcement agency of any change of address or other condition that may affect the administration of the order. The court may provide in the order that a party failing to inform the court or, as appropriate, the designated child support enforcement agency, of a change of address within a reasonable period of time may be held in civil contempt.

Upon affidavit of an obligee, the clerk or a district court judge may order the obligor to appear and show cause why the obligor should not be subjected to income withholding or adjudged in contempt of court, or both. The order shall require the obligor to appear and show cause why the obligor should not be subjected to income withholding or adjudged in contempt of court, or both, and shall order the obligor to bring to the hearing records and information relating to the obligor’s employment, the obligor’s licensing privileges, and the amount and sources of the obligor’s disposable income. The order shall state:

That the obligor is under a court order to provide child support, the name of each child for whose benefit support is due, and information sufficient to identify the order;

That the obligor is delinquent and the amount of overdue support;

(2a)

That the court may order the revocation of some or all of the obligor’s licensing privileges if the obligor is delinquent in an amount equal to the support due for one month;

That the court may order income withholding if the obligor is delinquent in an amount equal to the support due for one month;

That income withholding, if implemented, will apply to the obligor’s current payors and all subsequent payors and will be continued until terminated pursuant to

G.S. 110-136.10

;

That failure to bring to the hearing records and information relating to his employment and the amount and sources of his disposable income will be grounds for contempt;

That if income withholding is not an available or appropriate remedy, the court may determine whether the obligor is in contempt or whether any other enforcement remedy is appropriate.

The order may be signed by the clerk or a district court judge, and shall be served on the obligor pursuant to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4, Rules of Civil Procedure. On motion of the person to whom support is owed in a non-IV-D case, with the approval of the district court judge, if the district court judge finds it is in the best interest of the child, no order shall be issued.

, (f) Repealed by Session Laws 2005-389, s. 1.

(g)

Nothing in this section shall preclude the independent initiation by a party of proceedings for civil contempt or for income withholding.

History.

1983, c. 677, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 949, ss. 3-6; 1989, c. 479; 1993, c. 517, s. 6; c. 553, s. 67.1; 1995, c. 444, s. 1; c. 538, s. 1.2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1999-293, ss. 11-14; 2001-237, s. 7; 2005-389, s. 1; 2006-264, s. 97.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-389, s. 1, as
amended by Session Laws 2006-264, s. 97, effective January 1, 2007, rewrote subsection (b2); deleted the former first sentence of subsection (c), which read: “In a non-IV-D case, the parties affected by the order shall inform the clerk of court of any change of address or of other condition that may affect the administration of the order.”; rewrote subsection (d); deleted former subsection (e), which read: “The clerk of court shall maintain and make available to the district court judge a list of attorneys who are willing to undertake representation, pursuant to this section, of persons to whom child support is owed. No attorney shall be placed on such list without his permission”; and deleted former subsection (f), which related to exceptions to requirements for notification of judge in all enforcement hearings.

§ 50-13.10.
Past due child support vested; not subject to retroactive modification; entitled to full faith and credit.

Each past due child support payment is vested when it accrues and may not thereafter be vacated, reduced, or otherwise modified in any way for any reason, in this State or any other state, except that a child support obligation may be modified as otherwise provided by law, and a vested past due payment is to that extent subject to divestment, if, but only if, a written motion is filed, and due notice is given to all parties either:

Before the payment is due or

If the moving party is precluded by physical disability, mental incapacity, indigency, misrepresentation of another party, or other compelling reason from filing a motion before the payment is due, then promptly after the moving party is no longer so precluded.

A past due child support payment which is vested pursuant to G.S. 50-13.10(a) is entitled, as a judgment, to full faith and credit in this State and any other state, with the full force, effect, and attributes of a judgment of this State, except that no arrearage shall be entered on the judgment docket of the clerk of superior court or become a lien on real estate, nor shall execution issue thereon, except as provided in G.S. 50-13.4(f)(8) and (10).

As used in this section, “child support payment” includes all payments required by court or administrative order in civil actions and expedited process proceedings under this Chapter, by court order in proceedings under Chapter 49 of the General Statutes, and by agreements entered into and approved by the court under

G.S. 110-132

or

G.S. 110-133

.

For purposes of this section, a child support payment or the relevant portion thereof, is not past due, and no arrearage accrues:

From and after the date of the death of the minor child for whose support the payment, or relevant portion, is made;

From and after the date of the death of the supporting party;

During any period when the child is living with the supporting party pursuant to a valid court order or to an express or implied written or oral agreement transferring primary custody to the supporting party;

During any period when the supporting party is incarcerated, is not on work release, and has no resources with which to make the payment.

When a child support payment that is to be made to the State Child Support Collection and Disbursement Unit is not received by the Unit when due, the payment is not a past due child support payment for purposes of this section, and no arrearage accrues, if the payment is actually made to and received on time by the party entitled to receive it and that receipt is evidenced by a canceled check, money order, or contemporaneously executed and dated written receipt. Nothing in this section shall affect the duties of the clerks or the IV-D agency under this Chapter or Chapter 110 of the General Statutes with respect to payments not received by the Unit on time, but the court, in any action to enforce such a payment, may enter an order directing the clerk or the IV-D agency to enter the payment on the clerk’s or IV-D agency’s records as having been made on time, if the court finds that the payment was in fact received by the party entitled to receive it as provided in this subsection.

History.

1987, c. 739, s. 4; 1999-293, s. 15.

Cross References.

As to liens on real and personal property of persons owing past due child support, see

G.S. 44-86

.

As to discharge of liens on property of persons owing past due child support, see

G.S. 44-87

.

As to legislation deleting the June 30, 1998 expiration date for all enactments and amendments by Session Laws 1997-433, see the editor’s note under

G.S. 44-86

.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Using Hindsight to Change Child Support Obligations: A Survey of Retroactive Modification and Reimbursement of Child Support in North Carolina,” see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 111 (1987).

§ 50-13.11.
Orders and agreements regarding medical support and health insurance coverage for minor children.

The court may order a parent of a minor child or other responsible party to provide medical support for the child, or the parties may enter into a written agreement regarding medical support for the child. An order or agreement for medical support for the child may require one or both parties to pay the medical, hospital, dental, or other health care related expenses.

(a1)

The court shall order the parent of a minor child or other responsible party to maintain health insurance for the benefit of the child when health insurance is available at a reasonable cost. If health insurance is not presently available at a reasonable cost, the court shall order the parent of a minor child or other responsible party to maintain health insurance for the benefit of the child when health insurance becomes available at a reasonable cost. As used in this subsection, health insurance for the benefit of the child is considered reasonable in cost if the coverage for the child is available at a cost to the parent that does not exceed five percent (5%) of the parent’s gross income. In applying this standard, the cost is the cost of (i) adding the child to the parent’s existing coverage, (ii) child-only coverage, or (iii) if new coverage must be obtained, the difference between the cost of self-only and family coverage. The court may require one or both parties to maintain dental insurance.

The party ordered or under agreement to provide health insurance shall provide written notice of any change in the applicable insurance coverage to the other party.

The employer or insurer of the party required to provide health, hospital, and dental insurance shall release to the other party, upon written request, any information on a minor child’s insurance coverage that the employer or insurer may release to the party required to provide health, hospital, and dental insurance.

When a court order or agreement for health insurance is in effect, the signature of either party shall be valid authorization to the insurer to process an insurance claim on behalf of a minor child.

If the party who is required to provide health insurance fails to maintain the insurance coverage for the minor child, the party shall be liable for any health, hospital, or dental expenses incurred from the date of the court order or agreement that would have been covered by insurance if it had been in force.

When a noncustodial parent ordered to provide health insurance changes employment and health insurance coverage is available through the new employer, the obligee shall notify the new employer of the noncustodial parent’s obligation to provide health insurance for the child. Upon receipt of notice from the obligee, the new employer shall enroll the child in the employer’s health insurance plan.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1067, s. 1; 1991, c. 419, s. 2; c. 761, s. 42; 1997-433, s. 3.1; 1998-17, s. 1; 2003-288, s. 3.2; 2015-220, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-220, s. 1, effective August 18, 2015, rewrote the third sentence and added the present fourth sentence of subsection (a1). For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 50-13.12.
Forfeiture of licensing privileges for failure to pay child support or for failure to comply with subpoena issued pursuant to child support or paternity establishment proceedings.

As used in this section, the term:

“Licensing board” means a department, division, agency, officer, board, or other unit of state government that issues hunting, fishing, trapping, drivers, or occupational licenses or licensing privileges.

“Licensing privilege” means the privilege of an individual to be authorized to engage in an activity as evidenced by hunting, fishing, or trapping licenses, regular and commercial drivers licenses, and occupational, professional, and business licenses.

“Obligee” means the individual or agency to whom a duty of support is owed or the individual’s legal representative.

“Obligor” means the individual who owes a duty to make child support payments under a court order.

“Occupational license” means a license, certificate, permit, registration, or any other authorization issued by a licensing board that allows an obligor to engage in an occupation or profession.

Upon a finding by the district court judge that the obligor is willfully delinquent in child support payments equal to at least one month’s child support, or upon a finding that a person has willfully failed to comply with a subpoena issued pursuant to a child support or paternity establishment proceeding, and upon findings as to any specific licensing privileges held by the obligor or held by the person subject to the subpoena, the court may revoke some or all of such privileges until the obligor shall have paid the delinquent amount in full, or, as applicable, until the person subject to the subpoena has complied with the subpoena. The court may stay any such revocation pertaining to the obligor upon conditions requiring the obligor to make full payment of the delinquency over time. Any such stay shall further be conditioned upon the obligor’s maintenance of current child support. The court may stay the revocation pertaining to the person subject to the subpoena upon a finding that the person has complied with or is no longer subject to the subpoena. Upon an order revoking such privileges of an obligor that does not stay the revocation, the clerk of superior court shall notify the appropriate licensing board that the obligor is delinquent in child support payments and that the obligor’s licensing privileges are revoked until such time as the licensing board receives proof of certification by the clerk that the obligor is no longer delinquent in child support payments. Upon an order revoking such privileges of a person subject to the subpoena that does not stay the revocation, the clerk of superior court shall notify the appropriate licensing board that the person has failed to comply with the subpoena issued pursuant to a child support or paternity establishment proceeding and that the person’s licensing privileges are revoked until such time as the licensing board receives proof of certification by the clerk that the person is in compliance with or no longer subject to the subpoena.

An obligor may file a request with the clerk of superior court for certification that the obligor is no longer delinquent in child support payments upon submission of proof satisfactory to the clerk that the obligor has paid the delinquent amount in full. A person whose licensing privileges have been revoked under subsection (b) of this section because of a willful failure to comply with a subpoena may file a request with the clerk of superior court for certification that the person has met the requirements of or is no longer subject to the subpoena. The clerk shall provide a form to be used for a request for certification. If the clerk finds that the obligor has met the requirements for reinstatement under this subsection, then the clerk shall certify that the obligor is no longer delinquent and shall provide a copy of the certification to the obligor. Upon request of the obligor, the clerk shall mail a copy of the certification to the appropriate licensing board. If the clerk finds that the person whose licensing privileges have been revoked under subsection (b) of this section for failure to comply with a subpoena has complied with or is no longer subject to the subpoena, then the clerk shall certify that the person has met the requirements of or is no longer subject to the subpoena and shall provide a copy of the certification to the person. Upon request of the person, the clerk shall mail a copy of the certification to the appropriate licensing board.

If licensing privileges are revoked under this section, the obligor may petition the district court for a reinstatement of such privileges. The court may order the privileges reinstated conditioned upon full payment of the delinquency over time. Any order allowing license reinstatement shall additionally require the obligor’s maintenance of current child support. If the licensing privileges of a person other than the obligor are revoked under this section for failure to comply with a subpoena, the person may petition the district court for reinstatement of the privileges. The court may order the privileges reinstated if the person has complied with or is no longer subject to the subpoena that was the basis for revocation. Upon reinstatement under this subsection, the clerk of superior court shall certify that the obligor is no longer delinquent and provide a copy of the certification to the obligor. Upon request of the obligor, the clerk shall mail a copy of the certification to the appropriate licensing board. Upon reinstatement of the person whose licensing privileges were revoked based on failure to comply with a subpoena, the clerk of superior court shall certify that the person has complied with or is no longer subject to the subpoena. Upon request of the person whose licensing privileges are reinstated, the clerk shall mail a copy of the certification to the appropriate licensing board.

An obligor or other person whose licensing privileges are reinstated under this section may provide a copy of the certification set forth in either subsection (c) or (d) to each licensing agency to which the obligor or other person applies for reinstatement of licensing privileges. Upon request of the obligor or other person, the clerk shall mail a copy of the certification to the appropriate licensing board. Upon receipt of a copy of the certification, the licensing board shall reinstate the license.

Upon receipt of notification by the clerk that an obligor’s or other person’s licensing privileges are revoked pursuant to this section, the board shall note the revocation on its records and take all necessary steps to implement and enforce the revocation. These steps shall not include the board’s independent revocation process pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Administrative Procedure Act, which process is replaced by the court process prescribed by this section. The revocation pertaining to an obligor shall remain in full force and effect until the board receives certification under this section that the obligor is no longer delinquent in child support payments. The revocation pertaining to the person whose licensing privileges were revoked on the basis of failure to comply with a subpoena shall remain in full force and effect until the board receives certification of reinstatement under subsection (d) of this section.

History.

1995, c. 538, ss. 1, 1.1; 1997-433, s. 5.3; 1998-17, s. 1.